src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-msc-null_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:

  Noun - vuudar : # null stem
    vuudar+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: vuudar
    vuudar+N+Msc+Sg+Obl: vuudares
    vuudar+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: vuudareske
    vuudar+N+Msc+Sg+Abl: vuudaresta
    vuudar+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: vuudareha
    vuudar+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: vuudaresko
    vuudar+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Kiiro: [vuudareskiiro, vuudareskiiri, vuudareskiire]
    vuudar+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: vuudarja
    vuudar+N+Msc+Pl+Obl: [vuudaren, vuudarjen]
    vuudar+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: [vuudarenge, vuudarjenge]
    vuudar+N+Msc+Pl+Abl: [vuudarenna, vuudarjenna]
    vuudar+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: [vuudarensa, vuudarjensa]
    vuudar+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: [vuudarengo, vuudarjengo]
    vuudar+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Kiiro: [vuudarengiiro, vuudarjengiiro, vuudarengiiri, vuudarjengiiri, vuudarengiire, vuudarjengiire]


  Noun - grai : #  null stem
    grai+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: grai
    grai+N+Msc+Sg+Obl: ges
    grai+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: greske
    grai+N+Msc+Sg+Abl: gresta
    grai+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: gressa
    grai+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: gresko
    grai+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Kiiro: [greskiiro, greskiiri, greskiire]
    grai+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: graija
    grai+N+Msc+Pl+Obl: green
    grai+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: grenge
    grai+N+Msc+Pl+Abl: grenna
    grai+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: grensa
    grai+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: grengo
    grai+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Kiiro: [grengiiro, grengiiri, grengiire]

  Noun - tšeer : #  null stem
    tšeer+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: tšeer
    tšeer+N+Msc+Sg+Obl: tšeeres
    tšeer+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: tšeereske
    tšeer+N+Msc+Sg+Abl: tšeeresta
    tšeer+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: tšeereha
    tšeer+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: tšeeresko
    tšeer+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Kiiro: [tšeereskiiro, tšeereskiiri, tšeereskiire]
    tšeer+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: tšeere
    tšeer+N+Msc+Pl+Obl: tšeeren
    tšeer+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: tšeerenge
    tšeer+N+Msc+Pl+Abl: tšeerenna
    tšeer+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: tšeerensa
    tšeer+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: tšeerengo
    tšeer+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Kiiro: [tšeerengiiro, tšeerengiiri, tšeerengiire]

  Noun - bereȟ : #  null stem
    bereȟ+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: bereȟ
    bereȟ+N+Msc+Sg+Obl: bereȟȟes
    bereȟ+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: bereȟȟeske
    bereȟ+N+Msc+Sg+Abl: bereȟȟesta
    bereȟ+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: bereȟȟeha
    bereȟ+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: bereȟȟesko
    bereȟ+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Kiiro: [bereȟȟeskiiro, bereȟȟeskiiri, bereȟȟeskiire]
    bereȟ+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: bereȟȟe
    bereȟ+N+Msc+Pl+Obl: bereȟȟen
    bereȟ+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: bereȟȟenge
    bereȟ+N+Msc+Pl+Abl: bereȟȟenna
    bereȟ+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: bereȟȟensa
    bereȟ+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: bereȟȟengo
    bereȟ+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Kiiro: [bereȟȟengiiro, bereȟȟengiiri, bereȟȟengiire]


  Noun - lau : #  null stem
    lau+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: lau
    lau+N+Msc+Sg+Obl: laaves
    lau+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: laaveske
    lau+N+Msc+Sg+Abl: laavesta
    lau+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: laaveha
    lau+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: laavesko
    lau+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Kiiro: [laaveskiiro, laaveskiiri, laaveskiire]
    lau+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: laave
    lau+N+Msc+Pl+Obl: laaven
    lau+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: laavenge
    lau+N+Msc+Pl+Abl: laavenna
    lau+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: laavensa
    lau+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: laavengo
    lau+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Kiiro: [laavengiiro, laavengiiri, laavengiire]

  Noun - kaȟt : #  null stem
    kaȟt+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: kaȟt
    kaȟt+N+Msc+Sg+Obl: kaȟtes
    kaȟt+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: kaȟteske
    kaȟt+N+Msc+Sg+Abl: kaȟtesta
    kaȟt+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: kaȟteha
    kaȟt+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: kaȟtesko
    kaȟt+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Kiiro: [kaȟteskiiro, kaȟteskiiri, kaȟteskiire]
    kaȟt+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: kaȟte
    kaȟt+N+Msc+Pl+Obl: kaȟten
    kaȟt+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: kaȟtenge
    kaȟt+N+Msc+Pl+Abl: kaȟtenna
    kaȟt+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: kaȟtensa
    kaȟt+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: kaȟtengo
    kaȟt+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Kiiro: [kaȟtengiiro, kaȟtengiiri, kaȟtengiire]
